raw/lt-LT_raw.aff
FLAG num
SFX 17754 Y 21
SFX 17754 ai ai .	is:none
SFX 17754 ai iau [^dijt]ai	is:Comp
SFX 17754 dai džiau .	is:Comp
SFX 17754 iai iau .	is:Comp
SFX 17754 jai jau .	is:Comp
SFX 17754 tai čiau .	is:Comp
SFX 17754 ai iausiai [^dijt]ai	is:Super
SFX 17754 dai džiausiai .	is:Super
SFX 17754 iai iausiai .	is:Super
SFX 17754 jai jausiai .	is:Super
SFX 17754 tai čiausiai .	is:Super
SFX 17754 ai iausia [^dijt]ai	is:Super_short_rare
SFX 17754 dai džiausia .	is:Super_short_rare
SFX 17754 iai iausia .	is:Super_short_rare
SFX 17754 jai jausia .	is:Super_short_rare
SFX 17754 tai čiausia .	is:Super_short_rare
SFX 17754 ai yn [^i]ai	is:Il
SFX 17754 iai yn [^čž]iai	is:Il
SFX 17754 čiai tyn .	is:Il
SFX 17754 žiai žyn [^d]žiai	is:Il
SFX 17754 džiai dyn .	is:Il

SFX 17760 Y 5
SFX 17760 ai ėliau [^i]ai	is:Comp_Dmn
SFX 17760 čiai tėliau .	is:Comp_Dmn
SFX 17760 džiai dėliau .	is:Comp_Dmn
SFX 17760 iai ėliau [^žč]iai	is:Comp_Dmn
SFX 17760 žiai žėliau [^d]žiai	is:Comp_Dmn

SFX 17780 Y 8
SFX 17780 i i .	is:none
SFX 17780 i iau [^t]i	is:Comp
SFX 17780 ti čiau .	is:Comp
SFX 17780 i iausiai [^t]i	is:Super
SFX 17780 ti čiausiai .	is:Super
SFX 17780 i iausia [^t]i	is:Super_short_rare
SFX 17780 ti čiausia .	is:Super_short_rare
SFX 17780 i yn .	is:Il

SFX 17783 Y 1
SFX 17783 i ėliau .	is:Comp_Dmn

SFX 17789 Y 6
SFX 17789 g g .	is:none
SFX 17789 0 el .	is:rare
SFX 17789 0 iau .	is:Comp
SFX 17789 0 iausiai .	is:Super
SFX 17789 0 iausia .	is:Super_short
SFX 17789 0 yn .	is:Il

SFX 17792 Y 1
SFX 17792 0 ėliau .	is:Comp_Dmn

SFX 17796 Y 5
SFX 17796 a a [^it]a	is:none
SFX 17796 a iau [^it]a	is:Comp
SFX 17796 a iausiai [^it]a	is:Super
SFX 17796 a iausia [^it]a	is:Super_short
SFX 17796 a yn [^it]a	is:Il

SFX 17798 Y 1
SFX 17798 a ėliau [^it]a	is:Comp_Dmn

SFX 17802 Y 28
SFX 17802 ui ui [^dij]ui	is:none
SFX 17802 ui iau [^dij]ui	is:Comp
SFX 17802 ui iausiai [^dij]ui	is:Super
SFX 17802 ui iausia [^dij]ui	is:Super_short_rare
SFX 17802 iui iui [^čž]iui	is:none
SFX 17802 iui iau [^čž]iui	is:Comp
SFX 17802 iui iausiai [^čž]iui	is:Super
SFX 17802 iui iausia [^čž]iui	is:Super_short_rare
SFX 17802 čiui čiui .	is:none
SFX 17802 čiui čiau .	is:Comp
SFX 17802 čiui čiausiai .	is:Super
SFX 17802 čiui čiausia .	is:Super_short_rare
SFX 17802 žiui žiui [^d]žiui	is:none
SFX 17802 žiui žiau [^d]žiui	is:Comp
SFX 17802 žiui žiausiai [^d]žiui	is:Super
SFX 17802 žiui žiausia [^d]žiui	is:Super_short_rare
SFX 17802 džiui džiui .	is:none
SFX 17802 džiui džiau .	is:Comp
SFX 17802 džiui džiausiai .	is:Super
SFX 17802 džiui džiausia .	is:Super_short_rare
SFX 17802 dui dui .	is:none
SFX 17802 dui džiau .	is:Comp
SFX 17802 dui džiausiai .	is:Super
SFX 17802 dui džiausia .	is:Super_short_rare
SFX 17802 jui jui .	is:none
SFX 17802 jui jau .	is:Comp
SFX 17802 jui jausiai .	is:Super
SFX 17802 jui jausia .	is:Super_short_rare

SFX 17804 Y 7
SFX 17804 ui ėliau [^dij]ui	is:Comp_Dmn
SFX 17804 iui ėliau [^čž]iui	is:Comp_Dmn
SFX 17804 čiui tėliau .	is:Comp_Dmn
SFX 17804 žiui žėliau [^d]žiui	is:Comp_Dmn
SFX 17804 džiui dėliau .	is:Comp_Dmn
SFX 17804 dui dėliau .	is:Comp_Dmn
SFX 17804 jui jėliau .	is:Comp_Dmn

SFX 17837 Y 8
SFX 17837 iau iau [^č]iau	is:Comp
SFX 17837 iau iausiai [^č]iau	is:Super
SFX 17837 iau iausia [^č]iau	is:Super_short_rare
SFX 17837 iau yn [^č]iau	is:Il
SFX 17837 čiau čiau .	is:Comp
SFX 17837 čiau čiausiai .	is:Super
SFX 17837 čiau čiausia .	is:Super_short_rare
SFX 17837 čiau tyn .	is:Il

SFX 17838 Y 2
SFX 17838 iau ėliau [^č]iau	is:Comp_Dmn
SFX 17838 čiau tėliau .	is:Comp_Dmn

SFX 17847 Y 5
SFX 17847 a a .	is:none
SFX 17847 a omis .	is:none
SFX 17847 a om .	is:short
SFX 17847 omis omis .	is:none
SFX 17847 omis om .	is:short
